Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-720
Sewer district bonds.

The mayor and council may issue sewer district bonds to cover the cost of the work of constructing sewers in sewer districts, and the special assessment levied on account of such work shall constitute a sinking fund for the payment of such bonds.

Laws 1907, c. 9, § 10, p. 81;

R.S.1913, § 4530;

C.S.1922, § 3916;

C.S.1929, § 15-709;

R.S.1943, § 15-720.